Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-344
Violations; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person in the exercise of enjoyment of or on account of the person having exercised or enjoyed or having aided and encouraged any other person in the exercise of benefits and rights guaranteed by the Nebraska Fair Housing Act. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 120, § 17, p. 550;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 20-121;

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 45.